Utah statutes.
56-1-35.   Cabooses and locomotives -- Safety, health, and comfort rules for -- Issuance by commission.

The Public Service Commission shall issue general or special orders, rules, regulations, or otherwise; establishing minimum safety, health and comfort for railroad cabooses and locomotives.

